Utah statutes.
59-10-408.   Withholding rules -- Agreements with federal government.
The commission may prescribe and enforce reasonable rules necessary to carry
out the provisions of Sections 59-10-401 through 59-10-407, and to make such
agreements with the United States Government as it deems necessary or
advisable to provide for deduction and withholding of tax from wages of
federal employees in the state of Utah.
